raw/lt-LT_raw.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4448 Y 1
SFX 4448 is isai/4672,9999 .	is:Def

SFX 4449 Y 54
SFX 4449 is is .	is:Masc_Sg_Nom
SFX 4449 is s .	is:Masc_Sg_Nom_short_rare
SFX 4449 is io .	is:Masc_Sg_Gen
SFX 4449 is iam .	is:Masc_Sg_Dat
SFX 4449 is į .	is:Masc_Sg_Acc
SFX 4449 is iuo .	is:Masc_Sg_Inst
SFX 4449 is iame .	is:Masc_Sg_Loc
SFX 4449 is iuodu .	is:Masc_Dual_Nom
SFX 4449 is iedu .	is:Masc_Dual_Nom_deprecated_rare
SFX 4449 is iųdviejų .	is:Masc_Dual_Gen_rare
SFX 4449 is iemdviem .	is:Masc_Dual_Dat_rare
SFX 4449 is iedviem .	is:Masc_Dual_Dat_rare
SFX 4449 is iemdviems .	is:Masc_Dual_Dat_deprecated_rare
SFX 4449 is iedviems .	is:Masc_Dual_Dat_deprecated_rare
SFX 4449 is iuodu .	is:Masc_Dual_Acc_rare
SFX 4449 is iedu .	is:Masc_Dual_Acc_deprecated_rare
SFX 4449 is iemdviem .	is:Masc_Dual_Inst_rare
SFX 4449 is iedviem .	is:Masc_Dual_Inst_rare
SFX 4449 is iuodviejuose .	is:Masc_Dual_Loc_rare
SFX 4449 is iuodviejuos .	is:Masc_Dual_Loc_short_rare
SFX 4449 is ie .	is:Masc_Pl_Nom
SFX 4449 is ių .	is:Masc_Pl_Gen
SFX 4449 is iems .	is:Masc_Pl_Dat
SFX 4449 is iem .	is:Masc_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 4449 is iuos .	is:Masc_Pl_Acc
SFX 4449 is iais .	is:Masc_Pl_Inst
SFX 4449 is iuose .	is:Masc_Pl_Loc
SFX 4449 is i .	is:Fem_Sg_Nom
SFX 4449 is ios .	is:Fem_Sg_Gen
SFX 4449 is iai .	is:Fem_Sg_Dat
SFX 4449 is ią .	is:Fem_Sg_Acc
SFX 4449 is ia .	is:Fem_Sg_Inst
SFX 4449 is ioje .	is:Fem_Sg_Loc
SFX 4449 is ioj .	is:Fem_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 4449 is iedvi .	is:Fem_Dual_Nom
SFX 4449 is iodvi .	is:Fem_Dual_Nom_deprecated_rare
SFX 4449 is iuodvi .	is:Fem_Dual_Nom_deprecated_rare
SFX 4449 is iųdviejų .	is:Fem_Dual_Gen_rare
SFX 4449 is iomdviem .	is:Fem_Dual_Dat_rare
SFX 4449 is iodviem .	is:Fem_Dual_Dat_rare
SFX 4449 is iomdviems .	is:Fem_Dual_Dat_deprecated_rare
SFX 4449 is iodviems .	is:Fem_Dual_Dat_deprecated_rare
SFX 4449 is iedvi .	is:Fem_Dual_Acc_rare
SFX 4449 is iomdviem .	is:Fem_Dual_Inst_rare
SFX 4449 is iodviem .	is:Fem_Dual_Inst_rare
SFX 4449 is iodviejose .	is:Fem_Dual_Loc_rare
SFX 4449 is ios .	is:Fem_Pl_Nom
SFX 4449 is ių .	is:Fem_Pl_Gen
SFX 4449 is ioms .	is:Fem_Pl_Dat
SFX 4449 is iom .	is:Fem_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 4449 is ias .	is:Fem_Pl_Acc
SFX 4449 is iomis .	is:Fem_Pl_Inst
SFX 4449 is iom .	is:Fem_Pl_Inst_short_rare
SFX 4449 is iose .	is:Fem_Pl_Loc

SFX 4456 Y 4
SFX 4456 is ian .	is:Masc_Sg_Il
SFX 4456 is iuosna .	is:Masc_Pl_Il
SFX 4456 is ion .	is:Fem_Sg_Il
SFX 4456 is iosna .	is:Fem_Pl_Il

SFX 4507 Y 1
SFX 4507 is sai/4662,9999 .	is:Def

SFX 4508 Y 1
SFX 4508 is sai/4672,9999 .	is:Def

SFX 4509 Y 33
SFX 4509 ts ts .	is:Masc_Sg_Nom
SFX 4509 ts ties .	is:Masc_Sg_Gen
SFX 4509 ts čio .	is:Masc_Sg_Gen_deprecated
SFX 4509 ts čiam .	is:Masc_Sg_Dat
SFX 4509 ts tį .	is:Masc_Sg_Acc
SFX 4509 ts čiu .	is:Masc_Sg_Inst
SFX 4509 ts timi .	is:Masc_Sg_Inst_rare_deprecated
SFX 4509 ts tim .	is:Masc_Sg_Inst_short_rare_deprecated
SFX 4509 ts čiame .	is:Masc_Sg_Loc
SFX 4509 ts čiam .	is:Masc_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 4509 ts tys .	is:Masc_Pl_Nom
SFX 4509 ts čių .	is:Masc_Pl_Gen
SFX 4509 ts tiems .	is:Masc_Pl_Dat
SFX 4509 ts tiem .	is:Masc_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 4509 ts čius .	is:Masc_Pl_Acc
SFX 4509 ts čiais .	is:Masc_Pl_Inst
SFX 4509 ts čiuose .	is:Masc_Pl_Loc
SFX 4509 ts čiuos .	is:Masc_Pl_Loc_short
SFX 4509 ts ti .	is:Fem_Sg_Nom
SFX 4509 ts čios .	is:Fem_Sg_Gen
SFX 4509 ts čiai .	is:Fem_Sg_Dat
SFX 4509 ts čią .	is:Fem_Sg_Acc
SFX 4509 ts čia .	is:Fem_Sg_Inst
SFX 4509 ts čioje .	is:Fem_Sg_Loc
SFX 4509 ts čioj .	is:Fem_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 4509 ts čios .	is:Fem_Pl_Nom
SFX 4509 ts čių .	is:Fem_Pl_Gen
SFX 4509 ts čioms .	is:Fem_Pl_Dat
SFX 4509 ts čiom .	is:Fem_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 4509 ts čias .	is:Fem_Pl_Acc
SFX 4509 ts čiomis .	is:Fem_Pl_Inst
SFX 4509 ts čiom .	is:Fem_Pl_Inst_short_rare
SFX 4509 ts čiose .	is:Fem_Pl_Loc

SFX 4519 Y 4
SFX 4519 ts čian .	is:Masc_Sg_Il
SFX 4519 ts čiuosna .	is:Masc_Pl_Il
SFX 4519 ts čion .	is:Fem_Sg_Il
SFX 4519 ts čiosna .	is:Fem_Pl_Il

SFX 4520 Y 2
SFX 4520 ts čiu .	is:Masc_Dual
SFX 4520 ts ti .	is:Fem_Dual

SFX 4548 Y 1
SFX 4548 ts tsai/4662,9999 .	is:Def

SFX 4549 Y 1
SFX 4549 ts tsai/4672,9999 .	is:Def

SFX 4550 Y 1
SFX 4550 ts tsai/4673,9999 .	is:Def

SFX 4551 Y 17
SFX 4551 a a .	is:Neut_Sg_Nom
SFX 4551 a os .	is:Neut_Sg_Gen
SFX 4551 a ai .	is:Neut_Sg_Dat
SFX 4551 a ą .	is:Neut_Sg_Acc
SFX 4551 a a .	is:Neut_Sg_Inst
SFX 4551 a oje .	is:Neut_Sg_Loc
SFX 4551 a oj .	is:Neut_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 4551 a a .	is:Neut_Sg_Voc
SFX 4551 a os .	is:Neut_Pl_Nom
SFX 4551 a ų .	is:Neut_Pl_Gen
SFX 4551 a oms .	is:Neut_Pl_Dat
SFX 4551 a om .	is:Neut_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 4551 a as .	is:Neut_Pl_Acc
SFX 4551 a omis .	is:Neut_Pl_Inst
SFX 4551 a om .	is:Neut_Pl_Inst_short
SFX 4551 a ose .	is:Neut_Pl_Loc
SFX 4551 a os .	is:Neut_Pl_Voc

SFX 4559 Y 2
SFX 4559 a on .	is:Neut_Sg_Il
SFX 4559 a osna .	is:Neut_Pl_Il

SFX 4570 Y 6
SFX 4570 as as .	is:Nom
SFX 4570 as o .	is:Gen
SFX 4570 as am .	is:Dat
SFX 4570 as ą .	is:Acc
SFX 4570 as uo .	is:Inst
SFX 4570 as ame .	is:Loc

SFX 4576 Y 1
SFX 4576 as an .	is:Il

SFX 4577 Y 17
SFX 4577 i i .	is:Masc_Nom
SFX 4577 i ių .	is:Masc_Gen
SFX 4577 i iems .	is:Masc_Dat
SFX 4577 i iem .	is:Masc_Dat_short
SFX 4577 i is [^r]i	is:Masc_Acc
SFX 4577 i ius ri	is:Masc_Acc
SFX 4577 i iais .	is:Masc_Inst
SFX 4577 i iuose .	is:Masc_Loc
SFX 4577 i iuos .	is:Masc_Loc_short
SFX 4577 i ios .	is:Fem_Nom
SFX 4577 i ių .	is:Fem_Gen
SFX 4577 i ioms .	is:Fem_Dat
SFX 4577 i iom .	is:Fem_Dat_short
SFX 4577 i ias .	is:Fem_Acc
SFX 4577 i iomis .	is:Fem_Inst
SFX 4577 i iom .	is:Fem_Inst_short
SFX 4577 i iose .	is:Fem_Loc

SFX 4586 Y 2
SFX 4586 i iuosna .	is:Masc_Il
SFX 4586 i iosna .	is:Fem_Il

SFX 4596 Y 6
SFX 4596 as as .	is:Nom
SFX 4596 as o .	is:Gen
SFX 4596 as ui .	is:Dat
SFX 4596 as ą .	is:Acc
SFX 4596 as u .	is:Inst
SFX 4596 as e .	is:Loc

SFX 4602 Y 1
SFX 4602 as an .	is:Il

SFX 4603 Y 7
SFX 4603 a a .	is:Nom
SFX 4603 a os .	is:Gen
SFX 4603 a ai .	is:Dat
SFX 4603 a a .	is:Acc
SFX 4603 a a .	is:Inst
SFX 4603 a oje .	is:Loc
SFX 4603 a oj .	is:Loc_short

SFX 4610 Y 1
SFX 4610 a on .	is:Il

SFX 4611 Y 12
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimt .	is:Nom_short
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimt .	is:Gen_short_rare
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimt .	is:Dat_short_rare
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimt .	is:Acc_short
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimt .	is:Inst_short_rare
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimt .	is:Loc_short_rare
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimtis .	is:Nom
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimties .	is:Gen
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimčiai .	is:Dat
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimtį .	is:Acc
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimčia .	is:Inst
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimtyje .	is:Loc

SFX 4623 Y 1
SFX 4623 dešimt dešimtin .	is:Il

SFX 4624 Y 32
SFX 4624 iškis iškis .	is:Masc_Sg_Nom
SFX 4624 iškis iškio .	is:Masc_Sg_Gen
SFX 4624 iškis iškiam .	is:Masc_Sg_Dat
SFX 4624 iškis iškį .	is:Masc_Sg_Acc
SFX 4624 iškis iškiu .	is:Masc_Sg_Inst
SFX 4624 iškis iškiame .	is:Masc_Sg_Loc
SFX 4624 iškis iškiam .	is:Masc_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 4624 iškis iškiai .	is:Masc_Pl_Nom
SFX 4624 iškis iškių .	is:Masc_Pl_Gen
SFX 4624 iškis iškiams .	is:Masc_Pl_Dat
SFX 4624 iškis iškiam .	is:Masc_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 4624 iškis iškiems .	is:Masc_Pl_Dat
SFX 4624 iškis iškiem .	is:Masc_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 4624 iškis iškius .	is:Masc_Pl_Acc
SFX 4624 iškis iškiais .	is:Masc_Pl_Inst
SFX 4624 iškis iškiuose .	is:Masc_Pl_Loc
SFX 4624 iškis iškiuos .	is:Masc_Pl_Loc_short
SFX 4624 iškis iškė .	is:Fem_Sg_Nom
SFX 4624 iškis iškės .	is:Fem_Sg_Gen
SFX 4624 iškis iškei .	is:Fem_Sg_Dat
SFX 4624 iškis iškę .	is:Fem_Sg_Acc
SFX 4624 iškis iške .	is:Fem_Sg_Inst
SFX 4624 iškis iškėje .	is:Fem_Sg_Loc
SFX 4624 iškis iškėj .	is:Fem_Sg_Loc_short
SFX 4624 iškis iškės .	is:Fem_Pl_Nom
SFX 4624 iškis iškių .	is:Fem_Pl_Gen
SFX 4624 iškis iškėms .	is:Fem_Pl_Dat
SFX 4624 iškis iškėm .	is:Fem_Pl_Dat_short
SFX 4624 iškis iškes .	is:Fem_Pl_Acc
SFX 4624 iškis iškėmis .	is:Fem_Pl_Inst
SFX 4624 iškis iškėm .	is:Fem_Pl_Inst_short
SFX 4624 iškis iškėse .	is:Fem_Pl_Loc

SFX 4631 Y 4
SFX 4631 iškis iškian .	is:Masc_Sg_Il
SFX 4631 iškis iškiuosna .	is:Masc_Pl_Il
SFX 4631 iškis iškėn .	is:Fem_Sg_Il
SFX 4631 iškis iškėsna .	is:Fem_Pl_Il

SFX 4632 Y 2
SFX 4632 iškis iškiu .	is:Masc_Dual
SFX 4632 iškis iški .	is:Fem_Dual
